Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8811. CORPUS CHRISTI AQUIFER STORAGE AND RECOVERY CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8811.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Corpus Christi Aquifer Storage and Recovery Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Kleberg, Nueces, and San Patricio Counties created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution. The district is created to develop and protect municipal aquifer storage areas created by the City of Corpus Christi.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.003. CONFIRMATION ELECTION NOT REQUIRED. An election to confirm the creation of the district is not required.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.004. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. The initial boundaries of the district are coextensive with the city limits of the City of Corpus Christi and include:

(1) property owned by or under contract to the City of Corpus Christi in Nueces and Kleberg Counties; and

(2) in San Patricio County, property owned by or under contract to the City of Corpus Christi and bounded on the west by Interstate Highway 37 and U.S. Highway 77, on the north by the metropolitan planning organization boundary, on the east by County Road 2849, and on the south by the city limits of the City of Corpus Christi.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.005. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, Chapter 36, Water Code, applies to the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.006. CREATION OF GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS IN SAN PATRICIO COUNTY. (a) This chapter does not preclude the creation of a groundwater conservation district in San Patricio County.

(b) A groundwater conservation district created in San Patricio County may not limit or restrict the district from recovering water stored by the district in a municipal aquifer storage area in the district, even if the municipal aquifer storage area is also located in the groundwater conservation district.

(c) To the extent that the boundaries of the district and a groundwater conservation district in San Patricio County overlap, the power and authority of the two districts are joint and coextensive.

(d) The district and land in the district are exempt from taxes and fees imposed by a groundwater conservation district created in San Patricio County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8811.021. DIRECTORS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(c) The initial directors shall draw lots to determine which three directors shall serve four-year terms that expire at the end of the calendar year four years after the effective date of the Act creating this chapter, and which two directors shall serve two-year terms that expire at the end of the calendar year two years after the effective date of the Act creating this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.022. APPOINTMENT OF DIRECTORS. The Corpus Christi City Council shall appoint the directors.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.023. VACANCY. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the board may appoint a director to serve the remainder of the term.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.024. OFFICERS. The board shall annually elect officers. The officers must be confirmed by the Corpus Christi City Council.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8811.051. AQUIFER STORAGE AND RECOVERY PROJECTS. The district may implement and develop aquifer storage and recovery projects.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.052. MUNICIPAL AQUIFER STORAGE AREAS IN SAN PATRICIO COUNTY. The district may not allow more water to be recovered from a municipal aquifer storage area in San Patricio County than the amount of water stored by the district at the municipal aquifer storage area.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.053. TAXES AND BONDS PROHIBITED. The district may not impose a tax or issue bonds.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8811.054. EMINENT DOMAIN. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 3513), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.